Tennessee statutes. Title 66 Property
Part 1

General Provisions

66-24-101. Writings eligible for registration — Refusal to register documents not in English — Electronic records.

The following writings may be registered:

All agreements and bonds for the conveyance of real or personal estate;

All powers of attorney authorizing the sale, transfer, or conveyance of real or personal estate, or for any other purpose, or appointing an agent to transact any business whatever;

All revocations of powers of attorney;

All deeds for absolute conveyance of any lands, tenements or hereditaments, or any estate therein;

All instruments of writing for the absolute conveyance of personal property;

Copies of deeds of conveyance, with certificate of probate, of lands being in different counties in this state, certified by the register of the county where same has been first registered;

Deeds of gifts of any estate, real or personal;

All mortgages and deeds of trust of either real or personal property;

The acknowledgment of satisfaction and discharge of mortgage, trust, and other liens, by an entry in the margin of the record thereof;

All marriage settlements, contracts, or agreements;

Deeds and mesne conveyances for the settlement of property, real or personal, in consideration of marriage;

All other deeds of every description;

Transfers or assignments of plats and certificates of survey or locations of land;

All instruments in writing transferring or conveying any right of improvement, occupancy or preemption;

Leases for more than three (3) years from the time of making the same, or a summary or abstract of such leases;

Wills devising lands in Tennessee, or certified copies thereof, duly admitted to probate in Tennessee or in other states, together with certified copies of related probate orders;

Memoranda of judgments, attachments, orders, injunctions, and other writs affecting title, use or possession of real estate;

Certified copies of decrees divesting the title of land out of one person and vesting it in another;

Memoranda of judgments or decrees, stating the court, date of judgment, names of parties, and amount of judgment, to bind equitable interests in land or personalty;

Discharges of soldiers, sailors, marines, and naval and army officers of the United States. County registers are required, upon application of lawful holders thereof, to register such discharges without charge to the person named in the discharge, or to the holder of such discharge. Certified copies of such registered discharges issued by the register shall be legal evidence of such discharge;

Certified copies of the petition in bankruptcy, with schedules omitted, of the decree of adjudication and of the order of court approving the bond of the trustee, in any bankruptcy proceeding in any court of bankruptcy of the United States;

Receipts evidencing the payment of Tennessee inheritance taxes issued by the commissioner of revenue or the commissioner's authorized representative and nontaxable certificates evidencing that a sworn return for inheritance tax has been filed with the department of revenue by a duly qualified representative of the estate showing that it has been ascertained that the estate was not subject to tax, such nontaxable certificate having been issued by the commissioner or the commissioner's authorized representative;

All instruments granting, transferring, pledging or assigning an interest in leases or rents arising from real property;

All trust agreements or a summary or abstract of such agreements;

All instruments required to be filed pursuant to § 66-19-301;

Any instrument that provides for any party to agree to take any action regarding any interest in real property, or not to take such action regarding any interest in real property, including, but not limited to, any agreement to or negative agreement to mortgage, pledge, assign, hypothecate, alienate, subdivide, encumber, sell, transfer, or otherwise affect the real property or any part thereof;

All agreements described in subdivision (a)(26)(A) that are of record as of June 14, 1999, shall be deemed validly recorded and do not need to be re-recorded to have the benefit of subdivision (a)(26)(A) and shall further be deemed to have been validly recorded upon their initial registration;

Affidavits of scrivener's error and other affidavits in furtherance of identification and title to land. The affiant in the case of any affidavit of scrivener's error may attach a document, including a document previously recorded with corrections made by the affiant, with the affidavit; and

Reports of sale and notices reflecting tax sale results filed pursuant to any lawsuit for the sale of property for delinquent taxes.

The county register may refuse to register any writing eligible for registration in accordance with this title, if such writing, in the opinion of the county register, is illegible or cannot be legibly recorded or reproduced unless the person seeking to register the writing attaches to it for recording an affidavit stating that such writing is the best available original and sets forth the following facts regarding the writing:

The type of document or instrument;

The grantor or grantors and grantee or grantees;

The date of execution;

The name of the person or persons authenticating or acknowledging the signature of the grantor or grantors, and their title, if any;

A description of the real property, if any, being affected by the writing; and

All other information or recitals required by law for the registration of the writing that would otherwise be placed on the writing itself.

If an affidavit in the form and with the information as required by this subsection (b) is attached to the writing, the county register shall register the writing notwithstanding that it is illegible or cannot be legibly recorded or reproduced.

The county register may refuse to register any writing eligible for registration in accordance with this title if this writing is wholly or substantially written in any language other than English unless the person seeking to register the writing attaches an affidavit in which the affiant gives a complete translation of the writing offered for registration into English. The affidavit shall be recorded with the original writing and the original writing and its attached affidavit shall be treated as one instrument for recording purposes.

The county register may register a copy of an electronic document if the writing is otherwise eligible for registration and the electronic document is certified as a true and correct copy of the original as required in subdivision (d)(3).

For purposes of this section, an electronic document is defined as one of the following:

A writing created or retained as an electronic record in accordance with the Uniform Electronic Transactions Act (UETA), compiled in title 47, chapter 10, or the Uniform Real Property Electronic Recording Act (URPERA), compiled in part 2 of this chapter, as codified in this state or a substantially similar law of another state as defined in the URPERA, and transmitted to the county register electronically, or a paper copy of such an electronic record; or

A writing that is a digitized image of a paper document (electronic copy) that is transmitted to the county register electronically.

The certification of an electronic document shall be made by either a licensed attorney or the custodian of the electronic version of the document and the signature of that person shall be acknowledged by a notary public. The certification shall be transmitted with the electronic document and shall be recorded by the county register as a part of the document being registered. The certification of electronic document shall be in substantially the following form:

I, , do hereby make oath that I am a licensed attorney and/or the custodian of the electronic version of the attached document tendered for registration herewith and that this is a true and correct copy of the original document executed and authenticated according to law.

State of

County of

Personally appeared before me, , a notary public for this county and state, (name of person making certification) who acknowledges that this certification of an electronic document is true and correct and whose signature I have witnessed.

Notary's Signature

MY COMMISSION EXPIRES:

Notary's Seal (If on paper)

All electronic documents eligible for registration pursuant to this subsection (d) are validly registered when accepted for recording by the county register. Electronic documents registered by county registers prior to July 1, 2007, shall be considered validly registered with or without the certification provided in subdivision (d)(3).

No county register shall be required to accept a document transmitted electronically.

Unless an instrument is acknowledged or proved, as provided in chapter 22 of this title, or other applicable law:

The county register may refuse to register or note the instrument for registration; and

If the instrument conveys any interest in real property, including any lien on the property, no purchaser shall be required to accept delivery of the instrument. If, however, an instrument not so acknowledged or proved is otherwise validly registered, the instrument shall be deemed to be validly registered for the purposes of §§ 66-26-102 and 66-26-103, and in full compliance with all statutory requirements set forth in § 66-22-101, and all interested parties shall be on constructive notice of the contents of the instrument.

Subsection (e) shall apply to all instruments of record on or after June 6, 2005. However, if the relative priorities of conflicting claims to real property were established at a time prior to June 6, 2005, the law applicable to such claims at such time shall determine their priority.

Code 1858, § 2030 (deriv. Acts 1805, ch. 16, § 2; 1805, ch. 72, § 5; 1807, ch. 85, §§ 3, 4; 1831, ch. 90, §§ 1, 8, 11, 13; 1832, ch. 11, § 3; 1833, ch. 92, § 6; 1839-1840, ch. 26, § 1; 1841-1842, ch. 12, § 4; 1843-1844, ch. 187, § 1); Acts 1875, ch. 124, § 1; 1883, ch. 253, § 1; Shan., § 3697; Acts 1919, ch. 128, § 1; 1925, ch. 148, § 1; Shan. Supp., § 3704a8; mod. Code 1932, § 7621; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 7621; Acts 1981, ch. 405, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-2401; Acts 1984, ch. 603, § 1; 1984, ch. 892, § 1; 1989, ch. 213, § 1; 1989, ch. 364, § 5; 1990, ch. 756, § 2; 1995, ch. 162, § 1; 1999, ch. 364, §§ 1, 2; 2001, ch. 48, § 1; 2002, ch. 735, § 13; 2004, ch. 497, § 1; 2004, ch. 576, § 4; 2005, ch. 13, § 1; 2005, ch. 303, § 1; 2007, ch. 116, § 1; 2007, ch. 420, § 1; 2015, ch. 524, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2005, ch. 13, § 3 provided that Acts 2004, ch. 801 is repealed.

Acts 2015, ch. 524, § 3 provided that the act, which added (a)(28), shall apply to any sale occurring on or after January 1, 2016.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment added (a)(28).

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 524, § 3. January 1, 2016.

Cross-References. Contract for improvements to land, registration, §66-11-111.

Deeds, registration required, §66-5-106.

Durable power of attorney, §34-6-101 et seq.

Duties of register, §8-13-108.

Effective date of judgment lien, §25-5-101.

Indexes to public records, §10-7-201.

Leases required to be registered, §66-7-101.

Lien book, §§25-5-107,66-21-102,66-21-103.

Limited partnership certificate, title 61, ch. 2, part 2.

Mechanic's lien, registration of satisfaction, §66-11-135.

Notaries public, title 8, ch. 16.

Recordation tax, §67-4-409.

Registration abstract of justice's attachment on mechanic's lien, §66-11-134.

Registration of clerk's deed, §16-1-108.

Security interests, filing, §§47-9-302.

English deemed official and legal language, §4-1-404.

Uniform Electronic Transactions Act, §47-10-101 et seq.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 101.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 1 Tenn. Juris., Acknowledgments, §§ 3, 4; 3 Tenn. Juris., Assignments, § 35; 16 Tenn. Juris., Judgments and Decrees, §§ 32, 38; 19 Tenn. Juris., Mortgages and Deeds of Trust, § 20; 21 Tenn. Juris., Recording Acts, §§ 3, 5, 6; 25 Tenn. Juris., Wills, § 159.

Law Reviews.

Recent Decision, The Tennessee Court of Appeals Interprets the Tennessee Recording Statutes, Gregg v. Link, (1989), 56 Tenn. L. Rev. 777 (1989).

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1986, 54 Tenn. L. Rev. 457 (1987).

Attorney General Opinions. County register's office which makes all its public records available on the Internet may remove records regarding military discharges from the Internet while continuing to make other types of public documents available, OAG 02-133, 2002 Tenn. AG LEXIS 141 (12/18/02).

66-24-102. Certificates registered.

With the deed or instrument shall be registered all certificates of probate or acknowledgment, with the certificates for the authentication thereof, any commission to take acknowledgment or examination, and any correction made of the certificates as provided in this chapter.

Code 1858, § 2031 (deriv. Acts 1807, ch. 85, § 3; 1831, ch. 90, § 5); Shan., § 3698; Code 1932, § 7622; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-2402.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 21 Tenn. Juris., Recording Acts, § 8.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Recording System (Toxey H. Sewell), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 1 (1982).

66-24-103. Conveyances of land.

If the instrument be a conveyance, or for the conveyance, of land, it shall be registered in the county where the land lies, unless it lies partly in two (2) or more counties, and then it may be registered in either; and where it contains several tracts of land, lying in different counties, it shall be registered in each of the counties where any of the tracts lie.

Code 1858, § 2032 (deriv. Acts 1831, ch. 90, § 5); Shan., § 3705; Code 1932, § 7625; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-2403.

Cross-References. Recordation tax, §67-4-409.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 101.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 21 Tenn. Juris., Recording Acts, § 7.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Recording System (Toxey H. Sewell), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 1 (1982).

66-24-104. Conveyances of personal property.

All deeds, bills of sale, agreements, and other instruments for the conveyance or mortgage of personal property shall be registered in the county where the vendor or person executing the same resides, and, in case of nonresidence of the vendor or the person executing, where the property is.

Code 1858, § 2033 (deriv. Acts 1805, ch. 16, § 2; 1831, ch. 90, § 5); Shan., § 3706; Code 1932, § 7626; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-2404.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 21 Tenn. Juris., Recording Acts, § 7.

66-24-105. Marriage settlements.

Deeds for the settlement of personal property, in consideration of marriage, shall be registered in the county where the grantor or bargainor resides.

Code 1858, § 2034 (deriv. Acts 1805, ch. 16, § 2); Shan., § 3707; mod. Code 1932, § 7627; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-2405.

66-24-106. Marriage contracts settling property on wife.

Marriage contracts or agreements in which the wife's property, before marriage, is settled on her or a trustee for her use, shall be registered in the county where the husband resides at the time of marriage, and in every county in the state to which he may remove with the property; and if the contract or agreement be made without the limits of the state, they shall be registered in every county in the state to which the husband and wife removed with the property.

In case of realty, registration shall be also in the county where it lies.

Code 1858, § 2035 (deriv. Acts 1831, ch. 90, § 5); Shan., § 3708; mod. Code 1932, § 7628; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-2406.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 1 Tenn. Juris., Acknowledgments, § 3; 18 Tenn. Juris., Marriage Contracts and Settlements, § 7.

66-24-107. Registration of certified copies from previous registration.

Where any deed of conveyance, or any power of attorney to convey, in which more than one (1) tract of land is conveyed or to be conveyed, lying in different counties, with the proper probates, has been registered in any county in which one (1), or more, of the tracts lies or where any such judgment or decree has been so recorded, it shall be lawful for any one interested therein, to have registered in the county or counties in which the other tract or tracts are situated, a copy of the deed of conveyance or power of attorney and certificate of probate, or judgment or decree, certified by the register of the county in which the deed of conveyance, power of attorney, judgment or decree may have been thus registered; and such registration shall be valid, and a copy thereof shall be received as evidence as if such registration had been of the original.

Acts 1875, ch. 124, § 1; 1905, ch. 112, § 1; Shan., §§ 3711, 3711a1; mod. Code 1932, § 7629; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-2407.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 11 Tenn. Juris., Evidence, § 96.

66-24-108. Reregistration after destruction of records.

In all cases where the records of any register's office in any county have been, or may hereafter be, destroyed or mutilated by fire, or otherwise, the holder of any deed or instrument of which the record wherein it was originally registered has been destroyed or mutilated may have the same registered in the register's office of the county.

Acts 1895, ch. 24, § 1; Shan., § 3699; Code 1932, § 7623; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-2408.

66-24-109. Fees for reregistration or rerecording.

The register registering or recording such deeds or other instruments in writing heretofore recorded shall be entitled to demand and receive for such register's services compensation in accordance with the schedule set forth in §8-21-1001; provided, that nothing in this section shall be construed as authorizing or requiring the payment or collection of any additional transfer or other tax as a condition of such reregistration or rerecording.

Acts 1895, ch. 24, § 2; Shan., § 3700; mod. Code 1932, § 7624; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-2409; Acts 1983, ch. 475, § 1.

Cross-References. Registration fees, §8-21-1001.

Law Reviews.

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1983 (N. L. Resener, J. A. Whitson, K. J. Miller), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 785 (1983).

66-24-110. Recitals on instrument required for registration.

No instrument in writing affecting interests in real property, excepting instruments releasing liens on real property, shall be registered unless it contains a recital designating the deed, will, court decree or other source from which the grantor received the equitable interest.

If the source of equitable interest is a deed or other instrument recorded in the register's office or a will or court decree of record in the county, the type of instrument, office, book and page number of such instrument shall be recited on the instrument offered for registration.

If the source of equitable title is inheritance under the laws of intestate succession, then it shall be recited that the grantor took title by inheritance and the last recorded instrument conveying the equitable interest shall be named with the office, book and page number where such instrument is recorded.

If no such preceding instrument has been recorded, the instrument shall so recite.

No instrument releasing a lien on real property shall be registered unless it contains a recital designating the type of instrument, office, book and page number of the instrument which created the lien being released.

The recital required by this section shall be prepared and entered on each instrument required to be registered by the preparer of such instrument; provided, however, that if the deed or other instrument from which the grantor received the equitable interest is received by the register simultaneously with the instrument upon which the recital is required, then the preparer shall leave blanks in the recital for the book and page number or other appropriate reference and the register of deeds shall enter the appropriate reference after the deed or other instrument has been recorded.

Acts 1915, ch. 25, § 1; Shan., § 3704a5; mod. Code 1932, § 8085; Acts 1981, ch. 398, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-2410; Acts 1986, ch. 741, § 1; 1987, ch. 396, § 1; 2001, ch. 134, § 1.

Cross-References. Names and addresses required on deeds, §66-24-114.

Parcel identification number or affidavit required on deed, §66-24-121.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), Nos. 8-201, 8-202.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 21 Tenn. Juris., Recording Acts, § 7.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Recording System (Toxey H. Sewell), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 1 (1982).

66-24-111. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former §66-24-111 (Acts 1915, ch. 25, § 2; Shan., § 3704a6; mod. Code 1932, § 8086; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-2411), concerning endorsement as to last previous instrument, was repealed by Acts 1986, ch. 741, § 2.

66-24-112. Validity of registration unaffected by noncompliance.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prohibit the registration of instruments otherwise required by law to be registered, in the absence of a previously registered instrument respecting the property or subject matter embraced in the instrument delivered for registration; provided, that a failure of the record to show a compliance with the requirements of this chapter shall in nowise affect the validity of the registration of any registered instrument.

Acts 1915, ch. 25, § 3; Shan., § 3704a7; mod. Code 1932, § 8087; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-2412; Acts 1983, ch. 475, § 2.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Recording System (Toxey H. Sewell), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 1 (1982).

66-24-113. Metropolitan identification map.

Where any metropolitan government, as defined in § 7-1-101, has adopted an official property identification map which assigns to each parcel of property a number or other identifying symbol for property within the area of the metropolitan government, every deed offered for recording shall show on its face the number or other identifying symbol of the parcel or parcels, or portions of parcels, being transferred or conveyed.

The county register shall not record any deed without such number or symbol appearing thereon, and, if the property is improved, a notation at the end of the legal description of such property indicating that the property is improved, followed by the house and/or street number and post-office address.

An official property identification map for the purpose of this section is defined to be a property map or maps, prepared by or for the local government, which identifies all parcels of land, which assigns a number or other identifying symbol to each parcel, which shows names of streets and public ways, and which by appropriate and specific reference thereto has been adopted by the governing body of the metropolitan government as its official property identification map.

Acts 1963, ch. 71, § 1; T.C.A., § 64-2413.

66-24-114. Names and addresses required on deeds.

No deed of conveyance of real property, except for a deed of trust or mortgage, shall be received for recording by any register of deeds unless there shall be included thereon the name and address of a property owner and the name and address of the person or entity responsible for the payment of the real property taxes.

Acts 1973, ch. 287, § 1; 1975, ch. 201, § 1; T.C.A., § 64-2414; Acts 1986, ch. 563, § 1; 1987, ch. 187 § 1.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), Nos. 8-201, 8-202.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Recording System (Toxey H. Sewell), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 1 (1982).

66-24-115. Name of preparer of instrument.

No instrument by which the title to real estate or personal property, or any interest therein, or lien thereon, is conveyed, created, encumbered, assigned or otherwise affected, or disposed of, nor any power of attorney, including, but not limited to, any durable power of attorney for health care, shall be received for record, or filing, by the county register unless the name and address of the person or the governmental agency, if any, that prepared such instrument, appears within the instrument, and such name is either printed, typewritten, stamped, or signed in a legible manner.

An instrument will be in compliance with this section if it contains a statement in the following form: “This instrument was prepared by (name) (address) ”; provided, that the receiving for record, or filing, of any such instrument by the county register without complying with this section shall not prevent the instrument from becoming notice as now provided by law.

This section does not apply to any instrument executed prior to July 1, 1965, nor to any decree, order, judgment, writ of any court, will or death certificate.

This section shall not apply to any Uniform Commercial Code instrument, including instruments intended as or that relate to a fixture filing pursuant to § 47-9-502.

Acts 1965, ch. 363, § 1; T.C.A., § 64-2417; Acts 1999, ch. 105, §§ 1, 2; 2012, ch. 707, §§ 1, 2.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), Nos. 8-201, 8-202.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Recording System (Toxey H. Sewell), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 1 (1982).

66-24-116. Filing and recording restrictions for maps, plats and surveys.

It is unlawful for the recorder of deeds of any county or any proper public authority to file on record any map, plat, survey, or other document within the definition of land surveying which does not have impressed thereon, and affixed thereto, the personal signature and seal of a registered land surveyor, licensed to survey by title 62, chapter 18, or a registered engineer by whom the map, plat, survey or other document was prepared; except that any plat, map, survey or other document covered under this chapter and which was prepared prior to May 7, 1969, may be recorded by the recorder of deeds.

Instruments shall not be accepted for registration unless, in the opinion of the register to which the instrument is presented for recording, the map, plat or survey distinctly shows all words and figures necessary for clear and accurate determination of all metes, bounds, bearings, calls, easements or other information sought to be shown with sufficient clarity for reduction and/or reproduction in the register's office.

However, nothing in this section shall be construed as precluding the transfer of title nor the recording of any instrument evidencing such transfer between a willing buyer and a willing seller without survey nor shall this section preclude the use of an earlier recorded survey.

Acts 1969, ch. 207, § 17; 1971, ch. 337, § 1; T.C.A., § 64-2418.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Recording System (Toxey H. Sewell), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 1 (1982).

66-24-117. Master form of mortgage clauses.

An instrument containing a form or forms of covenants, conditions, obligations, powers, and other clauses of a mortgage or deed of trust may be recorded in the registry of deeds of any county and the recorder of such county, upon the request of any person, on tender of the lawful fees therefor, shall record the same in the recorder's registry. Every such instrument shall be entitled on the face thereof as a “Master Form recorded by (name of person causing the instrument to be recorded).” Such instrument need not be acknowledged to be entitled to record.

When the instrument is recorded, the recorder shall index the instrument under the name of the person causing it to be recorded in the manner provided for miscellaneous instruments relating to real estate.

After the recording of a master form pursuant to subsection (a) any or all of the provisions thereof may be incorporated by reference in a mortgage or deed of trust of real property situated within this state, provided:

The master form has been previously recorded in the same county;

The reference includes the date, the book volume, and the page or pages where the master form has been recorded; and

A copy of the master form has been furnished to each of the persons executing the mortgage or deed of trust; provided, that if the mortgage or deed of trust contains a recitation or acknowledgment that the copy has been furnished, such recitation or acknowledgment shall be conclusive proof that such copy has been furnished.

The recording of any mortgage or deed of trust which has so incorporated therein by reference any of the provisions of such master form shall have like effect as if such provisions had been set forth fully in the mortgage or deed of trust.

Whenever a mortgage or deed of trust is presented for recording which contains a verbatim copy of one (1) or more provisions of a master form previously recorded in the same county in conformity with subsection (a), the register shall not record such copied provisions, nor charge the recording fees therefor, unless requested to re-record the same by the person offering the instrument for recording, notwithstanding any statute or custom requiring the recording of the entirety of any instrument accepted for recording; provided, that:

Such mortgage or deed of trust shall, in the portion designated for recording, contain a proper reference to the date, volume, and page of the recording of the master form which contains the copied provisions; and

The copied provisions:

Are appropriately physically separated from the other provisions in such a way as to make it feasible to omit the same when the recording is done photographically; and

Are appropriately preceded by a notation direction to the effect of “do not record” or “not to be recorded.”

Any register of deeds who follows the above procedures in the performance of these duties shall not be liable for so doing, any other law to the contrary notwithstanding.

Acts 1967, ch. 334, § 1; T.C.A., §§ 64-2419 — 64-2922.

Collateral References.

Debts included in provisions of mortgage purporting to cover all future and existing debts (“Dragnet Clause”) — Modern Status, 3 A.L.R.4th 690.

66-24-118. Deed endorsements regarding deposit of hazardous wastes — Definitions.

The register shall, upon receiving notification from the commissioner of environment and conservation that hazardous wastes have been landfilled on property in the county, enter or endorse on the deed the following:

The hazardous wastes which are disposed of on such property;

The date of the notification of such disposal by the commissioner;

The date of the register's entry or endorsement; and

The official signature of the register.

The entry or endorsement shall be substantially as follows:

The commissioner of environment and conservation has determined that the following types of hazardous wastes have been or will be landfilled on this property and has notified this office of such disposal on (month), (day), (year).

This day of , 20 , Register.

The register shall record in the lien books such notifications received from the commissioner.

As used in this section:

“Landfilled” includes the disposal of such wastes in any settlement pond or lagoon which is not regulated by the division of water quality control and also includes disposal by open dumping; and

“Open dumping” means the depositing of solid wastes into a body or stream of water or onto the surface of the ground without compacting the waste and covering with suitable materials as prescribed in the regulations of the department of environment and conservation.

This section is to be administered by the division of solid waste management in the department of environment and conservation.

Acts 1979, ch. 382, § 2; T.C.A., § 64-2423; Acts 1992, ch. 693, § 1.

66-24-119. Judgments and writs affecting real estate.

Judgments, attachments, orders, injunctions, and other writs affecting title, use or possession of real estate, issued by any court shall be effective against any person having, or later acquiring, an interest in such property who is not a party to the action wherein such judgment, attachment, order, injunction, or other writ is issued only after an appropriate copy or abstract, or a notice of lis pendens, is recorded in the register's office of the county wherein the property is situated. If an abstract is used, the contents shall be as prescribed in §25-5-108.

Acts 1984, ch. 603, § 2.

66-24-120. Development and sale of real property for residential or commercial purposes in a manner exempt from municipal or county subdivision regulations — Required recording of boundary survey — Failure to comply.

If any person develops real property for residential or commercial purposes in a manner which exempts such development from the subdivision regulations of any county or municipality and then sells, transfers or enters into agreements or contracts for the sale of more than two (2) parcels of real property in such development in any calendar year, then such person must record a boundary survey showing the proposed development of the land within thirty (30) days of the sale of the second such parcel of real property.

Prima facie evidence of such development includes, but is not limited to, the construction of buildings, the opening of private driveways or the extension of utility services.

There is hereby created a civil cause of action for failure to record a boundary survey showing the proposed development of land as provided in this section for any person who discovers such noncompliance. A prevailing plaintiff shall be entitled to liquidated damages in an amount of one hundred dollars ($100) or the cost of obtaining a survey on such property, whichever is greater, plus reasonable attorneys' fees and costs.

This section shall only apply in counties having a population of not less than twenty-one thousand five hundred seventy-five (21,575) nor more than twenty-one thousand six hundred seventy-five (21,675) according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census.

Acts 1990, ch. 667, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

66-24-121. Name, address and license number of surveyor required on certain instruments for registration — Exceptions — Failure to comply.

No deed of conveyance of real property, except for a deed of trust or mortgage, shall be prepared unless there is included at the end of the legal description the name, license number and address of the surveyor who prepared the boundary survey from which the description was prepared. However, if no boundary survey was made at the time of conveyance and the legal description is different from the previous deed of record, the source of the new description shall be indicated. If the legal description is the same as in the previous deed of record, it shall be so stated.

A failure to comply with the requirements of this section shall not affect the validity of the registration of any registered instrument.

Acts 1991, ch. 432, § 1, 2.

Compiler's Notes. Former §66-24-121 (Acts 1990, ch. 790, § 1), concerning the registration of deeds of conveyance of real property, was repealed by Acts 1991, ch. 96, § 1, effective April 5, 1991. Acts 1991, ch. 432, §§ 1 and 2 enacted a new, similar section effective July 1, 1991.

66-24-122. Parcel identification number or affidavit required on deed.

A deed or other instrument transferring ownership of real property, but not including a deed of trust or mortgage, shall indicate the parcel identification number assigned by the county assessor of property or a sworn affidavit that such information was requested from the assessor and was not furnished promptly. The registrar of deeds shall accept no deed or other such instrument for recordation unless such information or affidavit is contained on the deed or other such instrument.

Nothing contained within this section shall be construed to affect the validity of the underlying transfer or conveyance. If a deed or other instrument is accepted for recordation which does not contain the required parcel identification number or affidavit as aforementioned, then the deed or instrument shall be recorded, and the absence of such number or statement shall in no way affect the preference, priority or legal validity of such deed or other evidence of transfer or the legal validity of the recording of the deed or instrument.

Nothing contained within this section shall be construed to affect the validity of the underlying transfer or conveyance. If, through error of the registrar of deeds, a deed or other evidence is accepted for recordation and does not contain the required parcel identification number or derivation clause, then the deed or instrument shall be recorded, and the absence of such number or clause shall in no way affect the preference, priority or legal validity of such deed or other evidence of transfer.

Acts 1990, ch. 933, § 1.

Cross-References. Names and addresses required on deeds, §66-24-114.

Recitals on instrument required for registration, §66-24-110.